Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [244.52] EARLY RELEASE FOR UNDOCUMENTED OFFENDERS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "term of imprisonment" has the meaning given in section 244.01, subdivision 8; and new text end new text begin (2) "undocumented offender" means an undocumented noncitizen who resides in the United States without the approval or acquiescence of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services who has been committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an undocumented offender is not eligible for early supervised release, conditional medical or epidemic release, the challenge incarceration program, earned incentive release credit, or any other program or credit that would reduce the undocumented offender's term of imprisonment. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must not release an undocumented offender from incarceration until the inmate has completed the inmate's term of imprisonment and any disciplinary confinement period imposed by the commissioner due to the inmate's violation of any disciplinary rule adopted by the commissioner or refusal to participate in a rehabilitative program required under section 244.03. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.133, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Undocumented offenders; ineligible for sentence adjustment. new text end new text begin An undocumented noncitizen who resides in the United States without the approval or acquiescence of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services is ineligible for sentence adjustment under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end